Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [148.2855] NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT. new text end new text begin The Nurse Licensure Compact is enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining in it, in the form substantially as follows: new text end new text begin ARTICLE 1 new text end new text begin DEFINITIONS new text end new text begin As used in this compact: new text end new text begin (a) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action permitted by a state's law that is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a nurse, including actions against an individual's license or multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse's authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action. new text end new text begin (b) "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring program approved by a licensing board. new text end new text begin (c) "Coordinated licensure information system" means an integrated process for collecting, storing, and sharing information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by licensing boards. new text end new text begin (d) "Current significant investigative information" means: new text end new text begin (1) investigative information that a licensing board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the nurse to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or new text end new text begin (2) investigative information that indicates that the nurse represents an immediate threat to public health and safety, regardless of whether the nurse has been notified and had an opportunity to respond. new text end new text begin (e) "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board. new text end new text begin (f) "Home state" means the party state that is the nurse's primary state of residence. new text end new text begin (g) "Licensing board" means a party state's regulatory body responsible for issuing nurse licenses. new text end new text begin (h) "Multistate license" means a license to practice as a registered or a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege. new text end new text begin (i) "Multistate licensure privilege" means a legal authorization associated with a multistate license permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered nurse (RN) or LPN/VN in a remote state. new text end new text begin (j) "Nurse" means an RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are defined by each party state's practice laws. new text end new text begin (k) "Party state" means any state that has adopted this compact. new text end new text begin (l) "Remote state" means a party state other than the home state. new text end new text begin (m) "Single-state license" means a nurse license issued by a party state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure privilege to practice in any other party state. new text end new text begin (n) "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States and the District of Columbia. new text end new text begin (o) "State practice laws" means a party state's laws, rules, and regulations that govern the practice of nursing, define the scope of nursing practice, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline. State practice laws do not include requirements necessary to obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE 2 new text end new text begin GENERAL PROVISIONS AND JURISDICTION new text end new text begin (a) A multistate license to practice registered or licensed practical/vocational nursing issued by a home state to a resident in that state will be recognized by each party state as authorizing a nurse to practice as an RN or LPN/VN under a multistate licensure privilege in each party state. new text end new text begin (b) A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate license or licensure by endorsement. The procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records. new text end new text begin (c) Each party state shall require the following for an applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home state: new text end new text begin (1) meets the home state's qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable state laws; new text end new text begin (2)(i) has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program; or new text end new text begin (ii) has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program that: new text end new text begin (A) has been approved by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable country; and new text end new text begin (B) has been verified by an independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing board-approved prelicensure education program; new text end new text begin (3) has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure education program not taught in English or if English is not the individual's native language, successfully passed an English proficiency examination that includes the components of reading, speaking, writing, and listening; new text end new text begin (4) has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN or NCLEX-PN Examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable; new text end new text begin (5) is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license; new text end new text begin (6) has submitted, in connection with an application for initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records; new text end new text begin (7) has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law; new text end new text begin (8) has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of nursing as determined on a case-by-case basis; new text end new text begin (9) is not currently enrolled in an alternative program; new text end new text begin (10) is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current participation in an alternative program; and new text end new text begin (11) has a valid United States Social Security number. new text end new text begin (d) All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with existing state due process law, to take adverse action against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, or any other action that affects a nurse's authorization to practice under a multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the home state of any such actions by remote states. new text end new text begin (e) A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the state in which the client is located at the time service is provided. The practice of nursing is not limited to patient care, but shall include all nursing practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party state in which the client is located. The practice of nursing in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege shall subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts, and the laws of the party state in which the client is located at the time service is provided. new text end new text begin (f) Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for a party state's single-state license as provided under the laws of each party state. However, the single-state license granted to these individuals will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice nursing in any other party state. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license. new text end new text begin (g) Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on the effective date of this compact, may retain and renew the multistate license issued by the nurse's then-current home state, provided that: new text end new text begin (1) a nurse, who changes primary state of residence after this compact's effective date, must meet all applicable paragraph (c) requirements to obtain a multistate license from a new home state; or new text end new text begin (2) a nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate licensure requirements in paragraph (c) due to a disqualifying event occurring after this compact's effective date shall be ineligible to retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse's multistate license shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators ("Commission"). new text end new text begin ARTICLE 3 new text end new text begin APPLICATIONS FOR LICENSURE IN A PARTY STATE new text end new text begin (a) Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information system, whether the applicant has ever held or is the holder of a license issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, and whether the applicant is currently participating in an alternative program. new text end new text begin (b) A nurse may hold a multistate license issued by the home state in only one party state at a time. new text end new text begin (c) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving between two party states, the nurse must apply for licensure in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the commission: new text end new text begin (1) the nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of residence; and new text end new text begin (2) a multistate license shall not be issued by the new home state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to the new home state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the new home state. new text end new text begin (d) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to a nonparty state, the multistate license issued by the prior home state will convert to a single-state license, valid only in the former home state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE 4 new text end new text begin ADDITIONAL AUTHORITIES INVESTED IN PARTY STATE LICENSING BOARDS new text end new text begin (a) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a licensing board shall have the authority to: new text end new text begin (1) take adverse action against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice within that party state: new text end new text begin (i) only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a nurse's license issued by the home state; and new text end new text begin (ii) for purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a remote state as it would if the conduct occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action; new text end new text begin (2) issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a nurse's authority to practice within that party state; new text end new text begin (3) complete any pending investigations of a nurse who changes primary state of residence during the course of the investigations. The licensing board shall also have the authority to take appropriate action and shall promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new home state of any such actions; new text end new text begin (4) issue subpoenas for hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a party state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located; new text end new text begin (5) obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-based information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for criminal background checks, receive the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal background checks, and use the results in making licensure decisions; new text end new text begin (6) if otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected nurse the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that nurse; and new text end new text begin (7) take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote state, provided that the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action. new text end new text begin (b) If adverse action is taken by the home state against a nurse's multistate license, the nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a nurse's multistate license shall include a statement that the nurse's multistate licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during the pendency of the order. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this compact shall override a party state's decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any nurse for the duration of the nurse's participation in an alternative program. new text end new text begin ARTICLE 5 new text end new text begin COORDINATED LICENSURE INFORMATION SYSTEM AND EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION new text end new text begin (a) All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system of RNs and LPNs. The system will include information on the licensure and disciplinary history of each nurse, as submitted by party states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement efforts. new text end new text begin (b) The commission, in consultation with the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate necessary and proper procedures for the identification, collection, and exchange of information under this compact. new text end new text begin (c) All licensing boards shall promptly report to the coordinated licensure information system any adverse action; any current significant investigative information; denials of applications, including the reasons for the denials; and nurse participation in alternative programs known to the licensing board, regardless of whether the participation is deemed nonpublic or confidential under state law. new text end new text begin (d) Current significant investigative information and participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated licensure information system only to party state licensing boards. new text end new text begin (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state licensing boards contributing information to the coordinated licensure information system may designate information that shall not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express permission of the contributing state. new text end new text begin (f) Any personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure information system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing the information. new text end new text begin (g) Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure information system that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that information shall also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information system. new text end new text begin (h) The compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) identifying information; new text end new text begin (2) licensure data; new text end new text begin (3) information related to alternative program participation; and new text end new text begin (4) other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by commission rules. new text end new text begin (i) The compact administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents and information requested by another party state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE 6 new text end new text begin ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION OF NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT ADMINISTRATORS new text end new text begin (a) The party states hereby create and establish a joint public entity known as the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators: new text end new text begin (1) the commission is an instrumentality of the party states; new text end new text begin (2) venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings; and new text end new text begin (3) nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity. new text end new text begin (b) Membership, voting, and meetings: new text end new text begin (1) each party state shall have and be limited to one administrator. The head of the state licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this compact for each party state. Any administrator may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the laws of the state from which the administrator is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists; new text end new text begin (2) each administrator shall be entitled to one vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. An administrator shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for an administrator's participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication; new text end new text begin (3) the commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission; new text end new text begin (4) all meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in article 7; new text end new text begin (5) the commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the commission must discuss: new text end new text begin (i) noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under this compact; new text end new text begin (ii) the employment, compensation, discipline, or other personnel matters, practices, or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission's internal personnel practices and procedures; new text end new text begin (iii) current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation; new text end new text begin (iv) negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services, or real estate; new text end new text begin (v) accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person; new text end new text begin (vi) disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential; new text end new text begin (vii) disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; new text end new text begin (viii) disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes; new text end new text begin (ix) disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on behalf of the commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this compact; or new text end new text begin (x) matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state statute; and new text end new text begin (6) if a meeting or portion of a meeting is closed pursuant to this provision, the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in the minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (c) The commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this compact, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) establishing the fiscal year of the commission; new text end new text begin (2) providing reasonable standards and procedures: new text end new text begin (i) for the establishment and meetings of other committees; and new text end new text begin (ii) governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the commission; new text end new text begin (3) providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity for attendance of the meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, including trade secrets. The commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the commission must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy votes allowed; new text end new text begin (4) establishing the titles, duties, and authority and reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the commission; new text end new text begin (5) providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the commission; and new text end new text begin (6) providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations. new text end new text begin (d) The commission shall publish its bylaws, rules, and any amendments in a convenient form on the website of the commission. new text end new text begin (e) The commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws. new text end new text begin (f) The commission shall meet and take actions consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws. new text end new text begin (g) The commission shall have the following powers: new text end new text begin (1) to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all party states; new text end new text begin (2) to bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected; new text end new text begin (3) to purchase and maintain insurance and bonds; new text end new text begin (4) to borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including but not limited to employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations; new text end new text begin (5) to cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to the regulation of nursing, including but not limited to sharing administrative or staff expenses, office space, or other resources; new text end new text begin (6) to hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this compact, and establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters; new text end new text begin (7) to accept any and all appropriate donations, grants, and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest; new text end new text begin (8) to lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use any property, whether real, personal, or mixed; provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety; new text end new text begin (9) to sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, whether real, personal, or mixed; new text end new text begin (10) to establish a budget and make expenditures; new text end new text begin (11) to borrow money; new text end new text begin (12) to appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of administrators, state nursing regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and other such interested persons; new text end new text begin (13) to provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies; new text end new text begin (14) to adopt and use an official seal; and new text end new text begin (15) to perform other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse licensure and practice. new text end new text begin (h) Financing of the commission: new text end new text begin (1) the commission shall pay or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities; new text end new text begin (2) the commission may also levy on and collect an annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost of its operations, activities, and staff in its annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based on a formula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states; new text end new text begin (3) the commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the party states, except by and with the authority of the party state; and new text end new text begin (4) the commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission. new text end new text begin (i) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification: new text end new text begin (1) the administrators, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct of that person; new text end new text begin (2) the commission shall defend any administrator, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining the person's counsel; and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct; and new text end new text begin (3) the commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct of that person. new text end new text begin ARTICLE 7 new text end new text begin RULEMAKING new text end new text begin (a) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to this article and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this compact. new text end new text begin (b) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission. new text end new text begin (c) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at least 60 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted on, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking: new text end new text begin (1) on the website of the commission; and new text end new text begin (2) on the website of each licensing board or the publication in which the state would otherwise publish proposed rules. new text end new text begin (d) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include: new text end new text begin (1) the proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted on; new text end new text begin (2) the text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the reason for the proposed rule; new text end new text begin (3) a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and new text end new text begin (4) the manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments. new text end new text begin (e) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments that shall be made available to the public. new text end new text begin (f) The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment. new text end new text begin (g) The commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing: new text end new text begin (1) hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings will be recorded and a copy will be made available upon request; and new text end new text begin (2) nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this section. new text end new text begin (h) If no person appears at the public hearing, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule. new text end new text begin (i) Following the scheduled hearing date or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received. new text end new text begin (j) The commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule. new text end new text begin (k) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice or opportunity for comment or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to: new text end new text begin (1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare; new text end new text begin (2) prevent a loss of commission or party state funds; or new text end new text begin (3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is required by federal law or rule. new text end new text begin (l) The commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the commission before the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision shall not take effect without the approval of the commission. new text end new text begin ARTICLE 8 new text end new text begin OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT new text end new text begin (a) Oversight: new text end new text begin (1) each party state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this compact's purposes and intent; and new text end new text begin (2) the commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the commission and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process in the proceeding to the commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated rules. new text end new text begin (b) Default, technical assistance, and termination: new text end new text begin (1) if the commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall: new text end new text begin (i) provide written notice to the defaulting state and other party states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default, or any other action to be taken by the commission; and new text end new text begin (ii) provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default; new text end new text begin (2) if a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state's membership in this compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default; new text end new text begin (3) termination of membership in this compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of the defaulting state's licensing board and each of the party states; new text end new text begin (4) a state whose membership in this compact has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination; new text end new text begin (5) the commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or whose membership in this compact has been terminated, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state; and new text end new text begin (6) the defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of the litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (c) Dispute resolution: new text end new text begin (1) upon request by a party state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among party states and between party and nonparty states; new text end new text begin (2) the commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate; and new text end new text begin (3) in the event the commission cannot resolve disputes among party states arising under this compact: new text end new text begin (i) the party states may submit the issues in dispute to an arbitration panel, that will be comprised of individuals appointed by the compact administrator in each of the affected party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the compact administrators of all the party states involved in the dispute; and new text end new text begin (ii) the decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding. new text end new text begin (d) Enforcement: new text end new text begin (1) the commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact; new text end new text begin (2) by majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with this compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of the litigation, including reasonable attorney fees; and new text end new text begin (3) the remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law. new text end new text begin ARTICLE 9 new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT new text end new text begin (a) This compact shall become effective and binding on the earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this compact into law by no less than twenty-six states or December 31, 2018. All party states to this compact that also were parties to the prior Nurse Licensure Compact that was superseded by this compact shall be deemed to have withdrawn from the prior compact within six months after the effective date of this compact. new text end new text begin (b) Each party state to this compact shall continue to recognize a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the prior compact until the party state has withdrawn from the prior compact. new text end new text begin (c) Any party state may withdraw from this compact by legislative enactment. A party state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute. new text end new text begin (d) A party state's withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state's licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of the withdrawal or termination. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this compact. new text end new text begin (f) This compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of all party states. new text end new text begin (g) Representatives of nonparty states to this compact shall be invited to participate in the activities of the commission on a nonvoting basis prior to the adoption of this compact by all states. new text end new text begin ARTICLE 10 new text end new text begin CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY new text end new text begin This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. This compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact is held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this compact shall remain in full force and effect for the remaining party states and in full force and effect for the party state affected as to all severable matters. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [148.2856] APPLICATION OF NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT TO EXISTING LAWS. new text end new text begin (a) Section 148.2855 does not supersede existing state labor laws. new text end new text begin (b) If the board takes action against an individual's multistate privilege, the action must be adjudicated following the procedures in sections 14.50 to 14.62 and must be subject to the judicial review provided for in sections 14.63 to 14.69. new text end new text begin (c) The board may take action against an individual's multistate privilege based on the grounds listed in section 148.261, subdivision 1, and any other statute authorizing or requiring the board to take corrective or disciplinary action. new text end new text begin (d) The board may take all forms of disciplinary action provided in section 148.262, subdivision 1, and corrective action provided in section 214.103, subdivision 6, against an individual's multistate privilege. new text end new text begin (e) The cooperation requirements of section 148.265 apply to individuals who practice professional or practical nursing in Minnesota under section 148.2855. new text end new text begin (f) Complaints against individuals who practice professional or practical nursing in Minnesota under section 148.2855 must be addressed according to sections 214.10 and 214.104. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the state government special revenue fund to the Board of Nursing for the purposes of implementing Minnesota Statutes, section 148.2855. new text end